Utah statutes.
76-8-302.   Picketing or parading in or near court.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he pickets or parades in or near a building which houses a court of this state with intent to obstruct access to that court or to affect the outcome of a case pending before that court.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

